Utah, session 2026, HB78.
Section 1. Section 19-3-113 is amended to read:19-3-113. Federal-state agreement regarding radiation control.(1)The governor, on behalf of the state, may enter into agreements with the federal government providing for discontinuation of the federal government's responsibilities with respect to sources of ionizing radiation and the assumption thereof by the state, pursuant to Section 19-3-104.(2)Any person who, on the effective date of an agreement under Subsection (1), possesses a license issued by the federal government is considered to possess a federal license pursuant to a license issued by the department which shall expire either 90 days after receipt from the department of a notice of expiration of the license, or on the date of expiration specified in the federal license, whichever is earlier.(3)Subject to authorization by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the division may oversee, regulate, or license activities related to the nuclear fuel cycle within state jurisdiction, including:(a)fuel enrichment;(b)fuel fabrication;(c)fuel conversion;(d)fuel reprocessing;(e)storage of nuclear material; and(f)waste management associated with nuclear fuel cycle activities.(4)The provisions of this section apply to agreements related to nuclear energy regulation described in Title 19, Chapter 14, Nuclear Energy Regulation Act.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 19-3-321 is enacted to read:19-3-321. Exemptions.This part does not apply to interim storage of nuclear waste if:(1)the waste:(a)is produced from a project authorized by the United States Department of Energy;(b)is from a test reactor; and(c)is produced at a facility owned by the state; and(2)the project described in Subsection (1)(a) is permitted and licensed by the division under this title.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 19-14-101 is enacted to read:14. Nuclear Energy Regulation Act1. General Provisions19-14-101. Definitions.(1)"Agreement State" means a state with which the Nuclear Regulatory Commission has entered into an agreement under Section 274 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2021, authorizing the state to regulate certain radioactive materials within the state.(2)"Board" means the Waste Management and Radiation Control Board created in Section 19-1-106.(3)"Director" means the director of the Division of Waste Management and Radiation Control.(4)"Division" means the Division of Waste Management and Radiation Control created in Subsection 19-1-105(1)(d).(5)"Nuclear fuel cycle" means activities related to nuclear energy production, including:(a)uranium enrichment;(b)fuel fabrication;(c)fuel reprocessing;(d)storage of nuclear material; and(e)waste management associated with nuclear fuel cycle activities.(6)"Nuclear Regulatory Commission" means the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission established under the Energy Reorganization Act of 1974 to regulate civilian use of nuclear materials.(7)"Office" means the Nuclear Energy Regulatory Office created in Section 19-14-102.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 19-14-102 is enacted to read:19-14-102. Nuclear Energy Regulatory Office -- Creation -- Duties -- Staffing.(1)There is created within the division the Nuclear Energy Regulatory Office.(2)The office shall:(a)coordinate state activities related to nuclear energy regulation;(b)serve as the primary liaison between the state and the Nuclear Regulatory Commission regarding:(i)licensing of nuclear fuel cycle activities; and(ii)the state's Agreement State status on all levels of the nuclear fuel cycle;(c)oversee the division's regulation of nuclear fuel cycle activities within state jurisdiction, as authorized by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission;(d)administer licensing and permitting programs for nuclear fuel cycle activities established under Section 19-14-103;(e)conduct compliance inspections and enforcement activities related to nuclear fuel cycle activities; and(f)provide technical assistance and guidance to applicants and licensees regarding nuclear energy regulation.(3)The division may employ staff necessary to carry out the duties of the office.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 19-14-103 is enacted to read:19-14-103. Nuclear energy regulation -- Rulemaking and fee authority.(1)(a)Subject to authorization by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the division may regulate or license activities related to the nuclear fuel cycle within state jurisdiction.(b)Chapter 3, Part 3, Placement of High Level Nuclear Waste, does not apply to  nuclear fuel cycle activities regulated or licensed by the division under this chapter.(2)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board may make rules establishing:(a)requirements and procedures for licensing nuclear fuel cycle activities;(b)standards and performance objectives for:(i)nuclear fuel cycle facility siting;(ii)compliance inspections;(iii)safety requirements;(iv)security measures;(v)environmental protection measures;(vi)emergency preparedness and response; and(vii)financial assurance and decommissioning;(c)procedures for coordinating with the Nuclear Regulatory Commission on regulatory processes;(d)qualification and training requirements for licensees and applicants;(e)record keeping and reporting requirements; and(f)enforcement procedures and penalties for violations of this chapter or rules made under this chapter.(3)(a)The division may establish and collect fees sufficient to cover the costs of:(i)licensing reviews and application processing;(ii)compliance inspections;(iii)program administration;(iv)staff training and development; and(v)cooperative activities with federal agencies.(b)The division shall comply with the requirements of Section 63J-1-504 in establishing fees under this Subsection (3).(c)The division shall deposit fees the division receives under this Subsection (3) into the Environmental Quality Restricted Account created in Section 19-1-108.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 19-14-104 is enacted to read:19-14-104. Federal engagement -- Agreement State status expansion -- Cooperative agreements -- Reporting.(1)The division shall:(a)evaluate the feasibility and benefit of pursuing expanded Agreement State status with the Nuclear Regulatory Commission regarding nuclear fuel cycle activities;(b)if the division determines that pursuing expanded Agreement State status is feasible and beneficial, pursue expanded Agreement State status with the Nuclear Regulatory Commission; and(c)develop procedures for coordinating with the Nuclear Regulatory Commission on regulatory processes retained by the federal government.(2)The director may enter into cooperative agreements or memoranda of understanding with the Nuclear Regulatory Commission or other federal agencies to:(a)implement this chapter;(b)facilitate coordination between state and federal nuclear energy regulation;(c)ensure consistent regulatory standards;(d)share technical expertise and resources; and(e)provide for joint inspections or other cooperative activities.(3)On or before November 30 of each year, the division shall report to the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee regarding:(a)progress toward expanded Agreement State status;(b)nuclear fuel cycle activities licensed or regulated by the state;(c)fees collected under Section 19-14-103;(d)staffing levels and training activities for the office;(e)coordination activities with federal agencies; and(f)any significant challenges or issues encountered in implementing this chapter.

Section 7:
Section 7.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.